New Jersey, session 222, S3580.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A public institution of higher education shall waive or reimburse the institutions application fee and fee for the receipt or transmission of a transcript for each veteran, member of the Armed Forces of the United States, member of the Reserve components thereof, or member of the New Jersey National Guard who resides in the State and accepts admission to the institution. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.